Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-212
Pledged securities; primarily liable
for trust or fiduciary obligations
and losses.

Securities pledged as provided in section 8-209
shall be primarily liable for the obligations of the trust company, state
or national bank, federal savings association, federally chartered trust company, out-of-state trust company
authorized under the Interstate Trust Company Office Act or otherwise doing business in this state, or an out-of-state
entity acting in a fiduciary capacity in this state, incurred
while acting in any fiduciary capacity, for depository of money in court,
and for losses arising from trust funds deposited with failed financial institutions
in excess of deposit insurance limits and shall not be liable for any other
debt or obligation of the financial
institution or out-of-state entity until all such trust liabilities
have been discharged.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XVIII, § 12, p. 722;

C.S.1922, § 8074;

C.S.1929, § 8-212;

Laws 1933, c. 20, § 1, p. 190;

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 78, p. 176;

Laws 1939, c. 3, § 2, p. 60;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-212;

R.S.1943, § 8-212;

Laws 1993, LB 81, § 26;

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 41;

Laws 2012, LB963, § 6.

Interstate Trust Company Office Act, see section 8-2301.